Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 4. Probation and Parole Generally

Cross references. —

As to probation and suspension of sentence, see article 3 of this chapter.

As to juvenile probation see title 14, chapter 6, article 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to notice and hearing before revocation of probation or parole, 29 ALR2d 1074, 44 ALR3d 306.

Withdrawal, forfeiture, modification or denial of good time allowance, 95 ALR2d 1265.

Right to assistance of counsel at proceedings to revoke probation, 44 ALR3d 306.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's refraining from political activity, protest or the like, 45 ALR3d 1022.

Propriety of requirement, as condition of probation, that defendant refrain from use of intoxicants, 19 ALR4th 1251.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's not entering specified geographical area, 28 ALR4th 725.

Right of convicted defendant to refuse probation, 28 ALR4th 736.

Propriety of probation condition exposing defendant to public shame or ridicule, 65 ALR5th 187.

United States Parole Commission Guidelines for federal prisoners, 61 ALR Fed 135.

Propriety, in criminal case, of federal district court order restricting defendant's right to re-enter or stay in United States, 94 ALR Fed 619.

67A C.J.S. Pardons § 1 et seq.

§ 7-13-401.
Definitions; creation of board; officers; compensation; hearing panels;
meetings.

As used in W.S.

7-13-401

through

7-13-424

:

“Board” means the state board of parole;

“Conditional release” means any form of release by an institution or by a court, other than parole or probation, which is subject to conditions imposed by the institution or court, but excludes release on bail;

“Conditional releasee” means an individual granted conditional release by an institution or court;

“Department” means the department of corrections;

“Director” means the director of the department of corrections;

“Institution” includes the Wyoming state penitentiary, state penitentiary farms and camps, Wyoming women’s center, Wyoming state hospital and any other state penal institution including a correctional facility operated by a private entity pursuant to W.S.

7-22-102

;

“Parole” means permission to leave the confines of the institution in which a person is confined under specified conditions, but does not operate as a discharge of the person;

“Parolee” means a prisoner or an inmate of an institution who has been granted parole;

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Probation” means a sentence not involving confinement which imposes conditions and retains authority in the sentencing court to modify the conditions of the sentence or to resentence the offender if he violates the conditions;

“Probationer” means a defendant granted probation by the sentencing court;

“Executive director” means the executive director of the board;

“Field services administrator” means the administrator for the department of corrections division of field services;

“Probation and parole agent” means an employee of the department of corrections, division of field services, who supervises a parolee or probationer;

“Compliance violation” means a violation of a condition of probation, parole or conditional release but shall not include:

An arrest for a new misdemeanor or felony offense; or

Absconding from supervision, which includes the defendant, probationer or parolee deliberately making his whereabouts unknown to his probation and parole agent, the department or court or failing to report for the purpose of avoiding supervision, where reasonable efforts by the probation and parole agent to locate the defendant, probationer or parolee have been unsuccessful.

There is created the state board of parole which consists of seven (7) members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be of the same political party. Members of the board shall be appointed for six (6) year terms. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Annually at the first meeting of the board, the members shall elect from their number a chairman and vice-chairman. Any vacancy caused by death, resignation or disqualification of a member of the board shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term of the member. Any vacancy occurring between sessions of the legislature may be filled by the governor in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101(b).

When engaged in the performance of their duties, members of the board shall receive salary in the amount paid to members of the Wyoming legislature and travel expenses and per diem in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

The board shall meet at least quarterly to conduct the business specified in subsection (f) of this section. Except as otherwise provided by subsection (f) of this section, four (4) members constitute a quorum. All matters shall be decided by a majority vote of those in attendance. The board may meet as often as necessary for the administration and conduct of its other business.

Three (3) or more members of the board may constitute a hearing panel empowered to review applications for parole, grant paroles or revoke paroles. Fewer than three (3) members of the board, as may be provided by rule of the board, may withdraw or revoke good time, restore or reinstate good time, make recommendations to the governor to grant commutations of sentences and review inmate matters, other than the grant or denial of parole, brought before the board. A decision by a majority of the members of a panel under this subsection is the decision of the board.

The board may employ an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the board as provided by appropriation of the legislature. The executive director and other staff members shall perform duties as may be assigned by the board.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 7-324, 9-194.3 to 9-194.6; Laws 1971, ch. 92, §§ 3 to 7; W.S. 1977, §§

7-13-401

, 9-3-803 to 9-3-806; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 114, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 1; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 175, § 1; 1988, ch. 83, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 252, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2001, ch. 15, § 1; 2003, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3; ch. 132, § 1; 2008, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2015 ch. 163, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to meetings of governmental agencies generally, see §

16-4-401

et seq.

As to penitentiary farms, see §

25-2-102

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “7-13-424” for “7-13-421” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(ii), inserted “but excludes release on bail” at the end; and added (a)(xiii) and (a)(xiv).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (f), deleted “make initial determinations of eligibility and restore voting rights pursuant to
W.S. 7-13-105(b) and (c)” preceding “make recommendations.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “four (4)” in the second sentence of (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(xv).

Applicability of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 252, § 3, provides: “The powers and authority set forth in this act shall be in addition to such other powers and authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming relating to correctional facilities or jails, and the requirements set forth in this act (including in particular, requirements relating to the obtaining of necessary consents and approvals) shall be deemed to apply only to actions taken or to be taken under authority of this act and shall not apply to any such other powers or authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming.”

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Appropriations. —

Laws 2003, ch. 127, § 2, provides: “(a) There is appropriated two hundred forty-six thousand nine hundred thirteen dollars ($246,913.00) from the general fund to the board of parole for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, to implement the purposes of this act. In addition, the board of parole is authorized an additional two (2) full-time positions to implement this act. Of this appropriation, fifty-five thousand two hundred fifty-seven dollars ($55,257.00) is considered to be onetime appropriations and shall not be included within the board of parole's standard budget request for the 2005-2006 biennium.

“(b) Expenditures of amounts appropriated under subsection (a) of this section for leasing office space shall not be expended unless space is not available within state office buildings.”

Authority to revoke probation.—

Lower court had the authority to revoke defendant’s probation because the probation violation occurred during the probationary period in that, following defendant’s no contest plea, the court suspended the execution of defendant’s sentence in one case and placed defendant on supervised probation. Then, after defendant violated the conditions of the probationary sentence imposed in another case, the court commenced probation revocation proceedings against defendant during the period in which the execution of that sentence was suspended. Sena v. State, 2019 WY 111, 451 P.3d 1143,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2019).

Violation of probation condition must be willful. —

In order to revoke probation for the violation of a condition of probation not involving the payment of money, the violation must be willful, or, if not willful, must presently threaten the safety of society. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, "Early Release From Prison in Wyoming: An Overviewof Parole in Wyoming and Elsewhere and an Examination of Currentand Future Trends”,see 11 Wyo. L. Rev. 99 (2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in prison proceedings, 9 ALR5th 451.

§ 7-13-402.
General powers and duties of board; eligibility for parole; immunity.

The board may grant a parole to any person imprisoned in any institution under sentence, except a sentence of life imprisonment without parole or a life sentence, ordered by any district court of this state, provided the person has served the minimum term pronounced by the trial court less good time, if any, granted under rules promulgated pursuant to W.S.

7-13-420

. The board may also grant parole to a person serving a sentence for an offense committed before the person reached the age of eighteen (18) years of age as provided in W.S. 6-10-301(c).

A prisoner is not eligible for parole on a sentence if, while serving that sentence, he has:

Made an assault with a deadly weapon upon any officer, employee or inmate of any institution; or

Escaped, attempted to escape or assisted others to escape from any institution.

In granting a parole the board shall fix terms and conditions it deems proper to govern the conduct of the parolee while the parole is in effect. The terms and conditions may be special in each case or they may be prescribed by general rules and regulations of the board, or both.

No person granted a parole shall be released from an institution until he has signed an agreement that he will comply with the terms and conditions under which he has been released and abide by the laws of the state. In addition, no person shall be granted a parole until the board makes a reasonable effort to notify victims who have registered to receive notification pursuant to W.S. 1-40-204(d) of the hearing and provides a reasonable opportunity for the victims to provide written comments to the board relative to the parole.

The board may adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the functions assigned to the board by W.S.

7-13-401

through

7-13-424

including rules relating to:

The conduct of proceedings, meetings, hearings and interviews;

The general conditions under which parole may be granted and revoked;

Parole applications and procedures, including the selection of hearing panels as provided by W.S.

7-13-401

(f);

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

Procedures to allow victims opportunity to comment on parole applications; and

Notification to victims of the pending release of prisoners.

The promulgation of substantive rules by the board, the conduct of its hearings and its final decisions are specifically exempt from all provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act including the provisions for judicial review under W.S.

16-3-114

and

16-3-115

. The board’s rules and regulations shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Notwithstanding W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-119

, the board and its members are immune from any liability, either as a board or individually, for any actions, inactions or omissions by the board or any member thereof, pursuant to W.S.

7-13-401

through

7-13-424

.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 163, § 2.

The board may order the arrest and return to the custody of the department of any parolee who has absconded from supervision, been charged with or convicted of a crime while on parole or committed an alleged violation of parole for which probable cause has been established through a hearing, or waiver thereof, pursuant to W.S.

7-13-408

. The written order of the board shall be sufficient warrant for any peace officer to return a parolee to custody. All peace officers shall execute any order of the board issued under this subsection. A parolee taken into custody under the order of the board is not subject to release on bail.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 2; 1953, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-325; Laws 1971, ch. 92, § 10; 1980, ch. 40, § 2; 1984, ch. 12, § 2; ch. 49, §§ 2, 3; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1987, ch. 135, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 83, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, §§ 3, 4; 1993, ch. 43, § 1; 1996, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 132, § 1; 2008, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2013 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 163, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “7-13-424” for “7-13-421” in the introductory language of (e) and in (g).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “on a sentence if, while serving that sentence” for “if”; in (d), substituted “who have registered to receive notification pursuant to
W.S. 1-40-204(d) of the hearing” for “of the parole,” inserted “the” preceding “victims,” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “The agreement shall be retained in the records of the department”; and added (j).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in (a).

The 2015 amendment,

in (f), deleted the second sentence which read “This exception shall not apply to the provisions authorizing a contested case hearing under
W.S. 7-13-105(c).”

Laws 2015, ch. 163, § 1, makes the act effective January 1, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1984, ch. 49, § 4, states that all rules and regulations adopted by the state board of parole relating to “good time,” before the creation of §

7-13-420

and amendment of §

7-13-402

by Laws 1984, ch. 49, shall continue in effect until revised or amended.

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2003, ch. 132, § 2, provides: “The intent of this act is to provide an opportunity to restore voting rights lost by persons convicted of felonies other than violent felonies regardless of when the conviction occurred. Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect the governor's powers under W.S.

7-13-105

to restore any rights lost pursuant to W.S.

6-10-106

.”

Constitutionality. —

District court lacked jurisdiction to consider defendant’s challenge to subsection (b) in a motion to correct his sentence because Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35 did not provide him an avenue for relief; the constitutionality of subsection (b) did not pertain to the validity of defendant’s sentence because it was an argument directed at the Board of Parole’s administration of his sentence. Sides v. State, 2021 WY 42, 483 P.3d 128,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2021).

Authority of parole board. —

Although the
aggregate sentences imposed on defendant for crimes committed as a
juvenile did not deprive the parole board of its statutory authority
to consider parole of a juvenile after 25 years, the sentence exceeded
the limits imposed by Miller v. Alabama and Bear Cloud v. State. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Eligibility for parole on serving minimum sentence. —

Any person imprisoned in any institution under sentence ordered by any Wyoming district court, except in the situation of a life sentence, is eligible for parole upon serving the minimum term pronounced by that court. Montez v. State, 573 P.2d 34,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 306

(Wyo. 1977).

Second sentence reduced minimum sentence. —

A second sentence imposed, “not less than three years nor more than seven years,” was, in effect, a reduction from that imposed from the bench previously, “not less than five years nor more than seven, with three years suspended from top time,” since defendant is now eligible for parole in three years rather than four, the minimum term having been reduced. Montez v. State, 573 P.2d 34,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 306

(Wyo. 1977).

Life without parole sentences for juveniles. —

Defendant's
life without parole sentence for a murder committed when defendant
was a juvenile was, as a matter of law, without the necessity of
a
Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35 motion, converted to life with the possibility
of parole in 25 years because (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-10-301(c) and 7-13-402(a) were amended to state a qualifying juvenile serving life
was eligible for parole after 25 years, and (2) the amendments applied
retroactively to defendant. State v. Mares, 2014 WY 126, 335 P.3d 487,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2014).

Instructions about availability of clemency or parole. —

With respect to the future dangerousness considerations of sentencing, it is not unconstitutional for a court to tell the jury about the possibility of executive clemency or parole, but the jury should be clearly informed about a defendant's statutory ineligibility for parole. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Trial court erred in granting presentence confinement credit against life sentence

when it had imposed a life sentence for murder and two five-to-ten-year sentences, each to be served concurrently, for drug conspiracy and aggravated assault and battery convictions, but consecutive to the life sentence. The defendant was entitled to credit upon that sentence which would be a benefit to him if he should ever reach a circumstance where the credit could be utilized for his release from confinement; that is, the credit should have been applied to the five-to-ten-year sentences and not against time which he could have served under the life sentence or any commuted term to which it could have been reduced. Weldon v. State, 800 P.2d 513,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1990).

Review not precluded. —

This section's silence on judicial review is not an indication of legislative intent to preclude review. Pisano v. Shillinger, 835 P.2d 1136,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1992).

No review based on conduct of hearings. —

The Wyoming Board of Parole's right to adopt its own procedures simply means that, barring any constitutional limitations, a parolee cannot seek judicial review of the board's decision upon grounds relating to the conduct of the board's hearings; however, the fact that the conduct of the hearing is not subject to review does not mean that the decision itself is not subject to review. Pisano v. Shillinger, 835 P.2d 1136,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1992).

Foreclosure of judicial review. —

The obvious purpose of subsection (f) is to completely foreclose judicial review of the proceedings and decisions of the Wyoming board of parole under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, including the limited review authorized in Pisano v. Shillinger, 835 P.2d 1136,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1992).Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

Dorman v. State, 665 P.2d 511,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1983); Price v. State, 716 P.2d 324,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 508

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979); Duffy v. State, 789 P.2d 821,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1990); Pena v. State, 792 P.2d 1352,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Hamby v. State, 559 P.2d 1388,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1977); Kennedy v. State, 595 P.2d 577,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1979); Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986); Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994); Mares v. State, 939 P.2d 724,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1997); Cothren v. State, 2013 WY 125, 310 P.3d 908,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 130

, 2013 WL 5570284 (Oct 10, 2013).

Stated in

Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Oct. 30, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

The propriety of conditioning parole on defendant's not entering specified geographical area, 54 ALR5th 743.

Sufficiency, under 18 USC § 4206(b) or (c), of statement by United States parole commission of reasons for denying parole, 58 ALR Fed 147.

Information considered by United States parole commission in making determinations relating to release on parole under § 2 of Parole Commission and Reorganization Act (18 USC §§ 4201 et seq.), 58 ALR Fed 911.

§ 7-13-403.
Custody of parolee; return upon violation.

A parolee is in the legal custody and under the control of the board and may be returned to the custody of the department for violation of a condition of his parole.

Unless otherwise ordered by the board or when the parole violator is ordered to complete a sanction under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

, a parole violator shall be returned to the custody of the department to serve the remainder of the original sentence.

The board shall consider imposing a sanction under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

before ordering a parole violator to be returned to the custody of the department to serve the remainder of the original sentence.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 7-326; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "by the board or when the parole violator is ordered to complete a sanction under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

" for "by the board"; and added (c).

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Cited

in

Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

§ 7-13-404.
Computing remainder of sentence for parole violator.

In computing the remainder of the sentence to be served by a parole violator, credit shall be awarded toward his original sentence for any portion of the time that the person has not violated a condition of parole between his release on parole and his return to the institution unless the board directs otherwise.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 7-327; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "credit shall be awarded toward" for "no credit shall be given against" and "time that the person has not violated a condition of parole between" for "time between."

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Constitutional due process rights of parole violator were not denied

where the parole board, pursuant to this section, denied the defendant credit for the time between his release on parole and his return to prison for parole revocation when computing the remainder of the sentence to be served. Heffernan v. State, 824 P.2d 1271,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of defendant sentenced after revocation of probation to credit for jail time served as condition of probation, 99 ALR3d 781.

§ 7-13-405.
Field services administrator; hiring of agents.

The department has general supervisory authority over state parolees and over probationers for whom the sentencing court requests supervision under W.S.

7-13-410

.

The director shall appoint a field services administrator. The department shall:

Keep records of all persons placed on parole or probation under the supervision of the department;

Cooperate with probation and parole officers of other states in the supervision of parolees and probationers from other states; and

Consult and cooperate with the courts and institutions of the state to develop plans and procedures to administer the probation and parole laws of the state.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

The field services administrator, with the approval of the director, shall coordinate the hiring of probation and parole agents.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the department may, by negotiation without competitive bid or by competitive bidding, contract with any governmental or nongovernmental entity to provide services, other than direct supervision and enforcement, required to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 5; 1949, ch. 70, § 1; 1951, ch. 56, § 1; 1953, ch. 139, § 28; 1957, ch. 157, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 7-328; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 6; 1965, ch. 115, § 5; 1967, ch. 181, § 29; 1969, ch. 168, § 32; 1971, ch. 92, § 8; ch. 190, § 17; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, §§ 3, 4; 2003, ch. 10, § 1; 2011, ch. 30, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “W.S.

7-13-410

” for “W.S.

7-13-410

(b)”; in the introductory language of (b) and in (c), subsituted “field services administrator” for “state probation and parole officer”; and substituted “coordinate the hiring of” for “appoint” in (c).

§ 7-13-406.
Offices.

Offices for probation and parole agents shall be maintained throughout the state as determined by the department.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 7-329; Laws 1971, ch. 92, § 9; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

§ 7-13-407.
Duties of probation and parole agents.

Under direction and supervision of the director, probation and parole agents shall:

Except as otherwise directed by the director, devote full time to the performance of their duties in carrying out the provisions of W.S.

7-9-104

,

7-9-107

,

7-13-303

,

7-13-401

through

7-13-424

,

7-13-1101

through

7-13-1105

,

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

,

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

and

35-7-1043

;

Investigate all cases referred by any court, the department or the board, and report to the court, department or board in writing;

Furnish to each person released on probation, parole or conditional release under his supervision a written statement of the conditions of the probation, parole or conditional release and instruct him regarding the conditions;

Supervise the conduct of each person on probation if requested by the court granting probation, and of each person on parole or conditional release through personal visits, reports and other appropriate means, and report in writing as often as required by the court, department or board;

Use all practicable and suitable methods, not inconsistent with the conditions imposed by the court, department or board and including the use of incentives and sanctions under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

, to aid and encourage persons on probation, parole or conditional release to bring about improvement in their conditions and conduct;

Perform other duties as directed by the director.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 20, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 7-331; Laws 1975, ch. 35, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-408

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2008, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 37, § 1, effective February 15, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to presentence investigations and reports, see Rule 32(a), W.R. Cr. P.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “7-13-424” for “7-13-421” in (a)(i).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(i), inserted “7-9-104,

7-9-107

,

7-13-303

” and “7-13-1101 through

7-13-1107

,

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

and

35-7-1043

.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, inserted “if requested by the court granting probation, and of each person on” following “each person on probation” in (a)(iv).

Laws 2019, ch. 37, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i), substituted “7-13-1101 through

7-13-1105

,

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

,

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

and

35-7-1043

” for “7-13-1101 through

7-13-1107

,

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

and

35-7-1043

,” and in (a)(v), added “and including the use of incentives and sanctions under W.S.

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

” following “or board.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Due process. —

Where a copy of the petition for revocation was not served upon defendant or his counsel prior to or during the probation revocation hearing, the failure to provide written notice to defendant was a defect affecting a substantial right and, under the circumstances, was prejudicial to his cause. Shaw v. State, 998 P.2d 965,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2000).

Report did not improperly contain confidential information. —

Presentence investigation report under the Addicted Offender Accountability Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1301

et seq., did not improperly contain confidential information because the information contained the in the evaluator's report to the probation and parole officer, which related directly to defendant's propensity for violence, was meant to be related to the district court as it was indispensable in deciding whether treatment options should be considered as part of any sentence.
Janpol v. State, 2008 WY 21, 178 P.3d 396,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2008).

Quoted

in

Anderson v. State, 2002 WY 46, 43 P.3d 108,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Hurst v. State, 698 P.2d 1130,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Moehr v. State, 13 P.3d 1114,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 2000);

Bitz v. State, 2003 WY 140, 78 P.3d 257,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Probation officer's liability for negligent supervision of probationer, 44 ALR4th 638.